Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6402
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Uninsured and Underinsured Motorist Insurance Coverage Act, the definitions found in sections 44-6403 to 44-6407 shall apply.

Laws 1986, LB 573, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-572;

Laws 1994, LB 1074, § 2.